Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Georgia Building Authority (Hospital)

31-7-24 through 31-7-40.
[Repealed and Reserved]

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 2/SB 130, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. SB573, § 1/SB 573, effective July 1, 2022, added a new Code section designated as Code Section 31-7-23. This previously reserved and repealed span is set out to reflect the change in the Code section span for former Article 2.